Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.180

Notices—Mailing—Proof.

The mailing of any notice required in connection with municipal local improvements shall be conclusively proved by the written certificate of the officer, board, or authority directed by the provisions of the charter or ordinance of a city or town to give the notice.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.180. Prior: 1929 c 97 s 4; RRS s 9373-1.]